Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5344.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1177. (1) A child enrolling in a public school or nonpublic school for the first time or , beginning in the 2014-2015 school year, enrolling in grade 7 for the first time shall submit 1 of the following: (a) A statement signed by a physician that the child has been tested for and immunized or protected against diseases specified by the director of the department of community health and human services. (b) A statement signed by a parent or legal guardian to the effect that the child has not been immunized because of religious or philosophical convictions or other objection to immunization. (c) A statement signed by a physician that certifies that the child is in the process of complying with all immunization requirements. (2) In addition, the The parent or legal guardian of each child enrolling in kindergarten for the first time shall submit a statement signed by a district, county, or city health department director stating that the child has been administered the department of community health and human services preschool vision screening test, or signed by a licensed medical or osteopathic physician or a licensed optometrist stating that the child's eyes have been examined during the preschool years after age 3 and before initial entrance. A vision test is not required if there is a statement signed by a parent or legal guardian to the effect that the child cannot be submitted to the test because of religious convictions. (3) Not By not later than November 1 of each year, the administrator governing body of each school shall provide the director of the department of community health and human services with the immunization status of each pupil in grades K through 12 who enrolled in the school for the first time , or , beginning in the 2014-2015 school year, enrolled in grade 7 in the school for the first time, between the immediately preceding January 1 and the immediately preceding September 30, as well as a vision report of each child entering kindergarten during that time period. This information shall must be transmitted through the approved local full-time health department, if available, and shall must be on forms provided by the director of community the department of health and human services or otherwise reported in a manner approved by the director of the department of community health and human services. Not later than February 1 of each year, the administrator governing body of each school shall provide an update to the report due the previous November 1 to show the immunization status of each pupil in grades K through 12 who enrolled in the school for the first time , or , beginning in the 2014-2015 school year, enrolled in grade 7 in the school for the first time, during the calendar year ending the immediately preceding December 31. This information shall must be transmitted in the same manner as the report due the previous November 1. Beginning June 1, 2028, an immunization status report provided under this subsection must be deidentified and aggregated and must include at least the following: (a) The percentage of pupils in the school who are fully immunized. (b) The percentage of pupils in the school who are partially immunized. (c) The percentage of pupils in the school who have received a waiver from the immunization requirements of this section. (4) Beginning with the 2028-2029 school year, the governing body of a public school shall do all of the following: (a) Provide a notice to the parent or legal guardian of each pupil enrolled in the public school containing the immunization status of each pupil in grades K to 12 who enrolled in the public school for the first time or enrolled in grade 7 in the school for the first time. The notice described in this subdivision may be provided through mail or email. (b) Make all of the information described in subdivision (a) available through a link on the homepage of the public school's website. (c) Post a paper notice containing all of the information described in subdivision (a) in a prominent location in the public school's main administrative office. (5) (4) The department of community health and human services shall promulgate rules, including rules identifying the diseases specified under subsection (1)(a), for the implementation of this section.